Utah statutes.
10-3-915.   Rights to arrest without warrant.

The members of the police force shall have the power and authority, without process, to arrest and take into custody any person who shall commit or threaten or attempt to commit in the presence of the officer, or within his view, any breach of the peace, or any offense directly prohibited by the laws of this state or by ordinance.



Enacted by Chapter 48, 1977 General Session

